Florida, session 2026, HB921.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb921-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 921 2026

Section 1. Paragraph (qq) is added to subsection (1) of
section 474.214, Florida Statutes, to read:
474.214 Disciplinary proceedings.—
(1) The following acts shall constitute grounds for which
the disciplinary actions in subsection (2) may be taken:
(qq) Failing to report suspected animal cruelty to the
proper authorities pursuant to s. 828.124.
Section 2. Paragraph (d) of subsection (4) of section
474.2165, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
474.2165 Ownership and control of veterinary medical
patient records; report or copies of records to be furnished.—
(4) Except as otherwise provided in this section, such
records may not be furnished to, and the medical condition of a
patient may not be discussed with, any person other than the
client or the client's legal representative or other
veterinarians involved in the care or treatment of the patient,
except upon written authorization of the client. However, such
records may be furnished without written authorization under the
following circumstances:
(d) In any criminal action or situation where a
veterinarian suspects a criminal violation, including, but not
limited to, animal cruelty. If a criminal violation, including
but not limited to animal cruelty as defined in s. 828.124, is
suspected, a veterinarian may, without notice to or
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb921-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 921 2026
authorization from the client, report the violation to a law
enforcement officer, an animal control officer who is certified
pursuant to s. 828.27(4)(a), or an agent appointed under s.
828.03. However, if a suspected violation occurs at a commercial
food-producing animal operation on land classified as
agricultural under s. 193.461, the veterinarian must provide
notice to the client or the client's legal representative before
reporting the suspected violation to an officer or agent under
this paragraph. The report may not include written medical
records except upon the issuance of an order from a court of
competent jurisdiction.
Section 3. Section 828.124, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
828.124 Reporting animal cruelty; medical records.—
(1) As used in this section, the term:
(a) "Animal cruelty" means any act or omission that
constitutes a violation of s. 828.12, s. 828.122, s. 828.126, or
s. 828.13.
(b) "Animal treatment provider" includes:
1. Any animal care facility, hospital, mobile service or
clinic, or shelter;
2. A private veterinary practice;
3. A college of veterinary medicine or veterinary
technology program;
4. A specialized veterinary hospital; or
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb921-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 921 2026
5. Any place dogs or cats are seen for any kind of
treatment.
(c) "Good faith report" means a report of animal cruelty
which is made by a person without malice or consideration of
personal benefit who has probable cause to believe such a report
is true.
(2) All of the following individuals must report
suspected, both past or ongoing, incidents of animal cruelty to
a local law enforcement officer, an animal control officer
certified pursuant to s. 828.27(4)(a), or an agent appointed
under s. 828.03:
(a) A veterinarian, if he or she has a
veterinarian/client/patient relationship with the animal.
(b) A veterinary technician employed by an animal
treatment provider or any other employee of the animal treatment
provider, if the animal is a past or current patient of the
animal treatment provider with whom the technician or employee
is employed.
(3) A veterinarian, veterinary technician, or other animal
treatment provider employee who makes a good faith report of
animal cruelty pursuant to this section to a local law
enforcement officer, an animal control officer, or an agent
appointed pursuant to subsection (2) shall be held harmless from
criminal liability, civil liability, professional disciplinary
100 action, and employer retaliation.
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb921-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 921 2026
101 (4) A veterinarian, excluding veterinarians subject to
102 chapter 474, a veterinary technician, or an animal treatment
103 provider employee or volunteer, who knowingly alters or destroys
104 a medical record for the purpose of concealing or attempting to
105 conceal animal cruelty or who causes the same to be done,
106 commits a misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as
107 provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083.
108 (5) This section may not be construed to prohibit any
109 person from making a good faith report of suspected animal
110 cruelty to any national, state, or local law enforcement
111 authority or any animal control agency.
112 Section 4. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb921-00